West Virginia, session 2026, SB93.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. ACTIONS FOR INJURIES. §55-7-33.  Limitations on medical monitoring damages. (a) Increased risk of disease, whether or not accompanied by physiological or other changes in the human body, is not compensable through damages or any other form of relief under the law of this state, regardless of the legal theory being asserted. In any civil action a defendant cannot be required to pay as damages or provide any other type of legal, injunctive or equitable relief for a plaintiff's future medical surveillance, screening tests, or monitoring procedures unless the plaintiff proves in addition to the other requirements for the underlying cause of action: (1) That such future medical surveillance, screening tests, or monitoring procedures are directly related to a presently existing and diagnosable physical disease of the plaintiff; and (2) that the plaintiff's presently existing physical disease was caused by the defendant's conduct.(b) In any civil action in which a court orders a defendant to pay for a plaintiff's future medical surveillance, screening tests, or monitoring procedures, no plaintiff shall be awarded or paid any moneys to cover the cost of his or her future medical surveillance, screening tests, or monitoring procedures until they have been completed. The court shall order that the liable defendant make periodic payments into a fund established to pay the cost of future medical surveillance, screening tests, or monitoring procedures that are required by the judgment of the court. The court shall determine how such fund will be administered. The court shall also determine the date after which such future medical surveillance, screening tests, or monitoring procedures are no longer required, and after that date any moneys remaining in the fund that are not needed to pay for medical surveillance, screening tests, or monitoring procedures completed prior to such termination date shall be repaid to the liable defendant who paid such amounts into the fund. If there are multiple such defendants, then repayments shall be made in proportion to the total contributions of each defendant into the fund.